Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 7. Assignment of Financial Interests.

§79-29-701.
Nature of financial interest in a limited liability company.

A financial interest in a limited liability company is intangible personal property.A member has no interest in specific limited liability company property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-701 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 43, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] provided a limited liability company interest is personal property. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.

Judgment of the district court in a case to determine ownership of cattle, granting summary judgment for the buyer of the cattle on the ground that the apparent seller was the owner and passed title to the buyer free of a lien, was reversed and remanded, because a fact issue existed on the ownership of the apparent seller; plaintiff bank’s and defendant bank’s security interests properly perfected on an individual and his property, attached to the cattle only if the apparent seller was a sole proprietorship of the individual, but if the apparent seller operated as a partnership or limited liability company, the individual did not have sufficient rights in the cattle to encumber them. Peoples Bank v. Bryan Bros. Cattle Co., 504 F.3d 549, 2007 U.S. App. LEXIS 24018 (5th Cir. Miss. 2007).

§79-29-702.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-702. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 44, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-702 was entitled: Assignment of limited liability company interest. For present provisions relating to assignment of financial interest in a limited liability company, see § 79-29-703.

§79-29-703.
Assignment of financial interest in a limited liability company.

A financial interest is assignable, in whole or in part.The assignee of a member’s financial interest shall have no right to participate in the management of the business and affairs of a limited liability company except as provided in an operating agreement and upon:

The approval of all of the members of the limited liability company other than the member assigning the financial interest; or

Compliance with any procedure provided for in the operating agreement.

An assignment of a financial interest does not dissolve a limited liability company or entitle the assignee to become or to exercise any rights or powers of a member;

An assignment of a financial interest entitles the assignee to share in such profits and losses, to receive such distribution or distributions, and to receive such allocation of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit or similar item to which the assignor was entitled, to the extent assigned; and

A member ceases to be a member, ceases to hold a governance interest, and ceases to have the power to exercise any rights or powers of a member upon assignment of all of the member’s financial interest.The pledge of, or granting of, a security interest, lien or other encumbrance in or against, any or all of the financial interest of a member shall not cause the member to cease to be a member or to cease to have the power to exercise any rights or powers of a member.

A member’s interest in a limited liability company may be evidenced by a certificate issued by the limited liability company.An operating agreement may provide for the assignment or transfer of any interest represented by such a certificate and make other provisions with respect to the certificates.A limited liability company shall not have the power to issue a certificate of an interest in a limited liability company in bearer form.

Except to the extent assumed by written agreement until an assignee of a financial interest becomes a member, the assignee shall have no liability as a member solely as a result of the assignment.

A limited liability company may acquire, by purchase, redemption or otherwise, any interest in the limited liability company.Any such interest so acquired by the limited liability company shall be deemed canceled.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-703 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 45, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to rights of creditors. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-705.

§79-29-704.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, §§ 3 and 4, effective January 1, 2011.

§79-29-704. [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 46, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

Former § 79-29-704 was entitled: Right of assignee to become a member. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-707.

§79-29-705.
Rights of creditor.

On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by a judgment creditor of a member, referred to in this section as the “judgment debtor,” the court may charge the financial interest of the judgment debtor with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment, with interest (referred to in this section as a “charging order”).To the extent so charged, the judgment creditor has only the rights of an assignee of the financial interest, however, the judgment creditor shall have no rights to bring a proceeding under Article 11 of this chapter.This article does not deprive any judgment debtor of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to the judgment debtor’s financial interest.

A charging order constitutes a lien on the judgment debtor’s financial interest.

The entry of a charging order is the exclusive remedy by which a judgment creditor of a judgment debtor or its assignee may satisfy a judgment out of the judgment debtor’s financial interest.

No creditor of a judgment debtor or its assignee shall have any right to obtain possession of, or otherwise exercise legal or equitable remedies with respect to, the property of the limited liability company.

The chancery court shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine any matter relating to any such charging order.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

A former § 79-29-705 [Laws, 1994, ch. 402, § 47, eff from and after July 1, 1994; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to the powers of estates of deceased or incompetent members. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading. For present similar provisions, see § 79-29-709.

§79-29-707.
Right of assignee to become a member.

An assignee of a financial interest may become a member with governance interests if and to the extent that:(a) the certificate of formation or operating agreement so provides; (b) all other members consent; or (c) in the case of an assignee of a member’s entire financial interest in which, immediately following the assignment, the limited liability company otherwise would have no members, simultaneously with and upon the assignment of the interest to an assignee who agrees to become a member.

An assignee who has become a member has, to the extent assigned, the governance rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a member under the certificate of formation or operating agreement and this chapter.An assignee who becomes a member also is liable for the obligations of the assignee’s assignor to make and return contributions as provided in Articles 5 and 6 of this chapter.However, the assignee is not obligated for liabilities or obligations unknown to the assignee at the time the assignee became a member and which could not be ascertained from the certificate of formation or the operating agreement.

Whether or not an assignee of a financial interest becomes a member, the assignor is not released from the assignor’s liability to the limited liability company under Articles 5 and 6 of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-709.
Powers of personal representative of deceased, incompetent or dissolved member.

If a court of competent jurisdiction adjudges a member to be incompetent, the member’s personal representative may exercise all rights until such time that the member’s competency is regained, including the member’s governance rights, on behalf of the member and any power under an operating agreement of an assignee to become a member.

If a member who is an individual dies, a personal representative of the member’s estate may exercise all rights for the purpose of settling the estate, including the governance rights that were held by such member at the time of the member’s death and any power under an operating agreement of an assignee to become a member.

If a member is a corporation, trust or other entity and such entity is dissolved, terminated or liquidated, the personal representative of the entity may exercise all rights and powers of that member until a successor is established, including the member’s governance rights.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.

§79-29-711.
Enforceability of limitations on assignments of financial interests.

Sections 75-9-406 and 75-9-408 do not apply to a member’s financial interest in a domestic limited liability company, including the rights, powers and interests arising under the limited liability company’s certificate of formation or operating agreement or under this chapter.To the extent of any conflict or inconsistency between this section and Sections 75-9-406 and 75-9-408, this section prevails.It is the express intent of this section to permit the enforcement, as an agreement among the members of a limited liability company, of any provision of an operating agreement that would otherwise be ineffective under Sections 75-9-406 and 75-9-408.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2011.